apertium-oss.oss.dix
    <!-- Nouns (Substantives) -->
    <pardef n="сӕр__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕн</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕй</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ыл</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ау</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ты</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тӕн</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тмӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тӕй</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ты</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тыл</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тау</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тимӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="цӕст__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕн</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕй</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ыл</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ау</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ытӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ыты</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ытӕн</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ытмӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ытӕй</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ыты</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ытыл</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ытау</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ытимӕ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="фӕнд/аг__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аг</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агы</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агӕн</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агмӕ</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агӕй</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агы</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агыл</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агау</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агимӕ</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕгт</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕгты</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕгтӕн</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕгтмӕ</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕгтӕй</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕгты</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕгтыл</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕгтау</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕгтимӕ</l>
          <r>аг<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="сӕр"><i>сӕр</i><par n="сӕр__n"/></e>
    <e lm="атом"><i>атом</i><par n="сӕр__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бӕх"><i>атом</i><par n="сӕр__n"/></e>
    <e lm="фонд"><i>фонд</i><par n="сӕр__n"/></e>
    <e lm="цӕст"><i>цӕст</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="цыхт"><i>цыхт</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="цырт"><i>цырт</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="кӕрт"><i>кӕрт</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="карк"><i>карк</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="цынк"><i>цынк</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="цынкъ"><i>цынкъ</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="цалх"><i>цалх</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕрх"><i>ӕрх</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="цырх"><i>цырх</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="пырх"><i>пырх</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бӕрц"><i>бӕрц</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="кӕрц"><i>кӕрц</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="уӕрцц"><i>уӕрцц</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="арц"><i>арц</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="арс"><i>арс</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="тӕрс"><i>тӕрс</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="уырс"><i>уырс</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="тӕрф"><i>тӕрф</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="арф"><i>арф</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="хуылф"><i>хуылф</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бындз"><i>бындз</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="чындз"><i>чындз</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="сындз"><i>сындз</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="чызг"><i>чызг</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="зынг"><i>зынг</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="зӕхх"><i>зӕхх</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="гӕпп"><i>гӕпп</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="уӕрыкк"><i>уӕрыкк</i><par n="цӕст__n"/></e>
    <e lm="фӕндаг"><i>фӕнд</i><par n="фӕнд/аг__n"/></e>
    <e lm="кӕсаг"><i>кӕс</i><par n="фӕнд/аг__n"/></e>
    <e lm="сæйраг"><i>сæйр</i><par n="фӕнд/аг__n"/></e>
